Hawaii, session 2025, HB1451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a) There is established the affordable housing land inventory task force to be placed in the Hawaii community development authority for administrative purposes. (b)  The task force shall consist of the following members or their designees: (1)  The director of the office of planning and sustainable development, who shall serve as the chairperson; (2)  The comptroller of the department of accounting and general services; (3)  The executive director of the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation; (4)  The executive director of the Hawaii public housing authority; (5)  The executive director of the Hawaii community development authority; (6)  The chairperson of the board of land and natural resources; and (7)  The executive director of the land use commission. Task force members may recommend to the task force additional members having appropriate special expertise, including representatives from organizations with experience in development or redevelopment, for approval by the chairperson. (c)  The task force shall: (1)  Update the maps, tier tables, and inventories of State lands suitable and available for affordable housing development that are in the affordable rental housing report and ten-year plan that was generated pursuant to Act 127, Session Laws of Hawaii 2016; (2)  Focus on existing urban lands to minimize the need for major regional infrastructure improvements; (3)  Examine mixed-use development opportunities to redevelop underutilized existing state-owned lands having one government tenant or use; (4)  Identify lands to accommodate one hundred thousand new housing units, and designate these as important housing lands; and (5)  Submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. (d)  The members of the task force shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties. (e)  No member of the task force shall be subject to chapter 84, Hawaii Revised Statutes, solely because of the member's participation in the task force. (f)  The Hawaii community development authority shall provide administrative and clerical support required by the task force. (g)  The task force shall be dissolved on January 1, 2026. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $1,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to fund a staff position and for contractual services incurred by the task force established pursuant to section 1 of this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii community development authority for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval; provided that section 2 shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________